Illinois, session 104th, HB2305.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Citizen Participation Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (735 ILCS 110/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Citizen Participation Act.9(Source: P.A. 95-506, eff. 8-28-07.)